Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.180

Custodial sexual misconduct—Defense.

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under RCW 9A.44.160 or 9A.44.170, to be proven by the defendant by a preponderance of the evidence, that the act of sexual intercourse or sexual contact resulted from forcible compulsion by the other person.

[ 1999 c 45 s 3.]